Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
651C]

UNIFORM
FRAUDULENT TRANSFER ACT

Section

651C-1 Definitions

651C-2 Insolvency

651C-3 Value

651C-4 Transfers fraudulent as to present and
future creditors

651C-5 Transfers fraudulent as to present
creditors

651C-6 When transfer is made or obligation is
incurred

651C-7 Remedies of creditors

651C-8 Defenses, liability, and protection of
transferee

651C-9 Extinguishment of cause of action

651C-10 Supplement of provisions

Law Journals and Reviews

The "ABCs" of Hawaii's Assignment for Benefit of
Creditors Law. 13 HBJ, no. 13, at 127 (2009).

Case Notes

Where a creditor alleges a fraudulent transfer of property
from a judgment debtor to a transferee who retains title to the subject
property or who claims an interest in the property or its proceeds, the
transferee is a necessary party to any action seeking to set aside the
transfer. Such an action for relief against a transfer alleged to be
fraudulent should be brought pursuant to this chapter, and should expressly
name as defendants the alleged fraudulent transferees. 76 H. 32, 868 P.2d 450
(1994).

Although Hawaii's uniform fraudulent transfer act does not
preclude preferential transfers per se, if the preferential transfer was made
with "actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor" the
transfer will be deemed fraudulent. 113 H. 174, 150 P.3d 823 (2006).

Where developer did not seek to directly obtain title to, or
possession of, property, but rather sought to avoid the transfer of the
property owner's and lessee's interest in the property for the purpose of
securing payment of money which might potentially be owed if developer
succeeded on its counterclaims, the developer's claim under this chapter was
asserted for a purpose which was rejected as a basis for a lis pendens under
§634-51; thus, circuit court did not abuse its discretion in granting county's
motion to expunge developer's lis pendens. 128 H. 378 (App.), 289 P.3d 1014
(2012).

Petitioners were entitled to a variety of means (§§651C-7,
651C-8, and 651C-10) to secure a full recovery of their losses from respondent
and/or the asset fraudulently transferred to respondent, but only once, not
twice; moreover, nothing in this chapter requires petitioners to elect one
remedy over another. This chapter does not, however, allow petitioners
recovery of both the asset transferred (regardless of its value) and, in
addition, a judgment in the full amount of their damages. 130 H. 58 (App.),
305 P.3d 474 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next